Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2141
Certified art therapist; reciprocity or prior experience; credential issued, when.

(1) The department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a credential under the Mental Health Practice Act as a certified art therapist based on licensure in another state or jurisdiction to an individual who meets the requirements of section 38-2140 or substantially equivalent requirements as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

(2) A person practicing art therapy in Nebraska before January 1, 2025, may apply for certification as an art therapist under the Mental Health Practice Act if such person completes an application and provides satisfactory evidence to the department that such person:

(a) Holds a credential in good standing as a Board Certified Art Therapist from the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc.;

(b) Has engaged in the practice of art therapy during at least three of the five years preceding submission of the application; and

(c) Has met any additional requirements as determined by the department, with the recommendation of the board.

Laws 2024, LB605, § 17.